Hawaii statutes.
[§353-16.36] Contracts for construction of
correctional facilities by private entities. The governor may enter into
and execute contracts in the name of the State with any private entity to
construct and then lease or purchase correctional facilities on public or
private lands for the benefit of the State. [L 1998, c 227, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next